Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.480

Construction of chapter—Waiver of other limits and requirements.

This chapter shall not be construed to affect or modify the existing statutory, regulatory, or charter powers of public bodies except to the extent that a procedure authorized by this chapter is adopted by a public body for a particular public works project. In that event, the normal contracting or procurement limits or requirements of a public body as imposed by statute, ordinance, resolution, or regulation shall be deemed waived or amended only to the extent necessary to accommodate such procedures for a particular public works project.

[ 1994 c 132 s 9. Formerly RCW 39.10.090.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.